Utah statutes.
4-22-6.   Commission to conduct elections -- Nomination of candidates -- Expenses of election paid by commission.

(1) (a)  The commissioner shall administer all commission elections.

(b)  The commissioner shall mail a ballot to each producer within the district in which an election is to be held by May 15 of each election year.

(c)  The candidate who receives the highest number of votes cast in the candidate's district shall be elected.

(d)  The commissioner shall determine all questions of eligibility.

(e)  A ballot shall be postmarked by May 31 of an election year.

(f) (i)  All ballots received by the commissioner shall be counted and tallied by June 15.

(ii)  A member of the commission whose name appears on a ballot may not participate in counting or tallying the ballots.

(2)  Candidates for election to the commission shall be nominated, not later than April 15, by a petition signed by five or more producers who are residents of the district in which the election is to be held.

(3)  The names of all nominees shall be submitted to the commissioner on or before May 1 of each year in which an election is held.

(4)  All election expenses incurred by the commissioner shall be paid by the commission.

